District of Columbia statutes.
29-1106

Ownership and transfer of property.

(a)

An unincorporated nonprofit association may acquire, hold, encumber, or transfer in its name an interest in property.

(b)

An unincorporated nonprofit association may be a beneficiary of a trust or contract, a legatee, or a devisee.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(k)(2), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 deleted “real or personal” preceding “property” in (a).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 6 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.